Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2801
Transportation Innovation Act, how cited.

Sections 39-2801 to 39-2825 shall be known and may be cited as the Transportation Innovation Act.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1016, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 67.
July 18, 2026